Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 12. Emergencies

§ 37-9-1201.
Emergency preparedness plan.

Each rail common carrier having annual carrier operating revenues in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00), which transports a hazardous material or hazardous waste (as defined by Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, Section 171.8, as may be revised and amended), shall adopt an emergency preparedness plan within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this act or the date of the rail common carrier’s first transport of such materials within the state of Wyoming. The plan shall include as a minimum, the following:

Notification procedures for advising the appropriate fire department or district or other public agency having the responsibility for responding to any emergency occurring in the area of any condition involving a release or threatened release of a hazardous material or hazardous waste where there is a reasonable belief that the actual or threatened release poses a significant present or potential harm to persons, property or the environment;

Procedures for mitigation of any such release or threatened release to minimize any potential harm or damage to persons, property or the environment; and

Training procedures to instruct railroad personnel on the actions to take in the event of any condition involving a release or threatened release of a hazardous material or hazardous waste where there is a reasonable belief that the actual or threatened release poses a significant present or potential harm to persons, property or the environment.

The plan required in subsection (a) of this section shall be filed with the Wyoming department of transportation within fifteen (15) days of the rail carrier’s adoption of such emergency preparedness plan.

Any rail common carrier which violates any provision of this section or its emergency preparedness plan shall be liable for a penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) per day for each violation, to be assessed in a civil action.

History.

1992 Initiative No. 3, § 1; Laws 1995, ch. 54, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section was enacted by initiative, approved by the voters on November 3, 1992, certified by the secretary of state on November 12, 1992, and effective February 10, 1993.

Severability. —

1992 Initiative No. 3, § 3, provides: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”